hunspell/kk/kk.aff
SFX p N 52
SFX p бу птім [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX p бу птым [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX p гу ктім [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX p ғу ктім [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX p гу ктым [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX p ғу қтым [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX p ду ттім [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX p ду ттым [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]му
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]у
SFX p у дым [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]су
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX p ю йдім [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX p ю йдым [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX Q N 52
SFX Q бу птік [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX Q бу птық [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX Q гу ктік [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX Q ғу ктік [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX Q гу ктық [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX Q ғу қтық [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX Q ду ттік [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX Q ду ттық [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]му
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]у
SFX Q у дық [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]су
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX Q ю йдік [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX Q ю йдық [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX q N 52
SFX q бу птің [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX q бу птың [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX q гу ктің [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX q ғу ктің [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX q гу ктың [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX q ғу қтың [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX q ду ттің [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX q ду ттың [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]му
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]у
SFX q у дың [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]су
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX q ю йдің [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX q ю йдың [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX R N 52
SFX R бу птіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX R бу птыңдар [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX R гу ктіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX R ғу ктіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX R гу ктыңдар [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX R ғу қтыңдар [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX R ду ттіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX R ду ттыңдар [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]му
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]у
SFX R у дыңдар [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX R у тыңдар [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]су
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX R ю йдіндер [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX R ю йдыңдар [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX r N 52
SFX r бу птіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX r бу птыңыз [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX r гу ктіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX r ғу ктіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX r гу ктыңыз [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX r ғу қтыңыз [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX r ду ттіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX r ду ттыңыз [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX r у діңіз [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX r у діңіз [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX r у діңіз [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX r у діңіз [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX r у діңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX r у діңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX r у діңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX r у дыңыз [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX r у дыңыз [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX r у дыңыз [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX r у дыңыз [аоуұыэ]му
SFX r у дыңыз [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX r у дыңыз [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX r у дыңыз [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX r у дыңыз [аоуұыэ]у
SFX r у дыңыз [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX r у тіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]су
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX r у тыңыз [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX r ю йдіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX r ю йдыңыз [аоуұыэ]ю
